Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.150

District treasurer—Warrants—Vouchers.

The county treasurer of the county in which the district shall be located shall be the treasurer of the district, and expenditures shall be made upon warrants drawn by the county auditor pursuant to vouchers approved by the board of park and recreation commissioners.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.69.150. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 16.]